src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
Verb inflection
The Lithuanian language verbs inflect in persons.

added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person

added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person

added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person

added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person

added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person
added indicative and person

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-lit/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
